Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.490

Deposits in court—Enforcement of order.

Whenever, in the exercise of its authority, a court shall have ordered the deposit or delivery of money or other thing, and the order is disobeyed, the court, besides punishing the disobedience as for contempt, may make an order requiring the sheriff to take the money or thing, and deposit or deliver it, in conformity with the direction of the court.

[Code 1881 s 196; 1877 p 41 s 200; 1869 p 49 s 200; 1854 p 163 s 175; RRS s 746.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 67.